test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-nekalcj_gt-norm.yaml
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалхавэхэюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалхавэхэюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалхавэхэюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалхавэхэюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалхавэхэюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалхавэхэюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалхавын
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалхавыд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалхавыда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалхавыниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалхавыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалхавыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалхавынаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалхавыдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалхавыдоʼ                     
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg1: нэкалманадмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg2: нэкалманан
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg3: нэкалмана
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu1: нэкалмананиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu2: нэкалманадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu3: нэкалманахаʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl1: нэкалманаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl2: нэкалманадаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl3: нэкалманаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалманав
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалманар
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалманада
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалманамиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалманариʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалманадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалманаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалманараˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалманадоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалманахаюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалманахаюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалманахаюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалманахаюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалманахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалманахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалманахаюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалманахаюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалманахаюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалманан
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалманад
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалманда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалманниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалмандиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалмандиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалманнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалмандаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалмандоʼ                        
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1: нэкалвадмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2: нэкалван
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3: нэкалва
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1: нэкалваниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2: нэкалвадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3: нэкалвахаʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1: нэкалваваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2: нэкалвадаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3: нэкалваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалвав
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалвар
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалвада
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалвамиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалвариʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалвадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалваваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалвараˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалвадоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалвахаюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалвахаюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалвахаюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалвахаюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалвахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалвахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалвахаюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалвахаюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалвахаюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалбин
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалбид
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалбида
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалбиниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалбидиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалбидиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалбинаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалбидаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалбидоʼ      
     нэкалць+V+TV+InfImprf: нэкалма  
     нэкалць+V+TV+InfPrf: нэкалоˮма 
     нэкалць+V+TV+PrcImprf: нэкалта
     нэкалць+V+TV+PrcPrf: нэкалмы
     нэкалць+V+TV+PrcFut: нэкалмында   
     нэкалць+V+TV+PrcNeg: нэкалмдавэй
     нэкалць+V+TV+Ger: нэкалць 
     нэкалць+V+TV+GerFin: нэкалманзь      
     нэкалць+V+TV+Subord: нэкалпˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Evas+Abs: нэкалмоӈгад
     нэкалць+V+TV+ConNeg: нэкалˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+ConNeg: нэкалтˮ

     нэкалць+V+TV+Subord+PxSg1: [нэкалпˮнани, нэкалпаˮни]
     нэкалць+V+TV+Subord+PxSg2: [нэкалпˮнанд, нэкалпат]
     нэкалць+V+TV+Subord+PxSg3: [нэкалпˮнанда, нэкалпата] 
     нэкалць+V+TV+Subord+PxDu1: [нэкалпˮнаниʼ, нэкалпаˮниʼ]
     нэкалць+V+TV+Subord+PxDu2: [нэкалпˮнандиʼ, нэкалпаˮтиʼ]
     нэкалць+V+TV+Subord+PxDu3: [нэкалпˮнандиʼ, нэкалпаˮтиʼ]
     нэкалць+V+TV+Subord+PxPl1: [нэкалпˮнанаˮ, нэкалпаˮнаˮ]
     нэкалць+V+TV+Subord+PxPl2: [нэкалпˮнандаˮ, нэкалпатаˮ]
     нэкалць+V+TV+Subord+PxPl3: [нэкалпˮнандоʼ, нэкалпатоʼ]       
     
     нэкалць+V+TV+Evas+PxSg1: [нэкалмоӈгадан, нэкалмоӈгаданиʼ]
     нэкалць+V+TV+Evas+PxSg2: нэкалмоӈгаданд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Evas+PxSg3: нэкалмоӈгаданда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Evas+PxDu1: нэкалмоӈгаданиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Evas+PxDu2: нэкалмоӈгадандиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Evas+PxDu3: нэкалмоӈгадандиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Evas+PxPl1: нэкалмоӈгаданаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Evas+PxPl2: нэкалмоӈгадандаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Evas+PxPl3: нэкалмоӈгадандоʼ
 
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: нэкалтадмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: нэкалтан
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нэкалта
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: нэкалтаниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: нэкалтадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нэкалтахаʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: нэкалтаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: нэкалтадаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нэкалтаˮ
     
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалтав
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалтар
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалтада
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалтамиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалтариʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалтадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалтаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалтараˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалтадоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалтаӈахаюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалтаӈахаюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалтаӈахаюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалтаӈахаюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалтаӈахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалтаӈахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалтаӈахаюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалтаӈахаюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалтаӈахаюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалтын
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалтыд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалтыда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалтыниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалтыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалтыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалтынаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалтыдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалтыдоʼ 
